Tennessee, session 114, HB2519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-56-209(a), is amended by adding
the following to the end of the subsection:
The annual report may be submitted electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2519
012372
- 1 -